
Users’ Guide for the African Standard 
and Guidelines for Quality Assurance 
in Higher Education (ASG-QA)



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

1

Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance 
in Higher Education (ASG-QA)
Introduction 
Background of the African Standards and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education

The African Standards and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA) were developed in 2018 as part of the Pan-African Quality Assurance and 
Accreditation Framework (PAQAF), which provides, a continental framework to harmonise higher education quality assurance systems and promote compatible 
methodologies, endorsed by the African Union. 

The ASG-QA were developed following a mapping of existing standards at national and regional levels, a comparison with other existing international standards and 
guidelines as well as a broad stakeholder consultation. This was done with the support of the HAQAA Initiative – Harmonisation, Accreditation and Quality Assurance 
in African Higher Education, funded by the European Union in support of its partnership with the African Union. 

As a tool of the PAQAF, the ASG-QA aim to support higher education institutions (HEIs) and quality assurance agencies (QAAs) in developing adequate internal and 
external quality assurance systems and practices that correspond to international good practice. Indeed, it provides a unified basic framework that is general enough 
to take into account the diversity of national contexts, while ensuring comparability.

The Standards are stated as common minimum standards or requirements. The Guidelines – which are more specific – describe how the standards might be achieved 
and allow for the provision of evidence to support the status of quality at HEIs and QAAs. They provide examples of good practice, and the list is not exhaustive. 

The ASG-QA are neither prescriptive nor exhaustive, thus allowing it to be applied to all quality assurance processes and all types of HEIs in Africa, regardless of the 
mode of study or location, including transnational and cross-border education. The ASG-QA consequently allow an enhancement-led approach for the escalation of 
institutional and educational quality.

The ASG-QA are available in the four official languages of the African Union: English, French, Arabic and Portuguese, and have already been widely disseminated and 
utilised by national QA agencies and QA systems in Africa, as well as HEIs. The African Union Commission’s Science and Technology Committee (STC) has repeatedly 
urged African member states to further the uptake and usage of the ASG-QA, in conjunction with national or regional standards, where they exist. 

Regarding the latter, it is very important to stress that the ASG-QA, and subsequently this User’s Guide, have been developed upon the principle of compatibility 
and added continental value for Africa. Prior to developing the ASG-QA in 2016, an extensive mapping was conducted that looked at existing standards, guidelines 
and references for quality assurance and accreditation at national and regional levels. Existing and well referenced standards like those of East Africa and of Conseil 



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

2

Africain et Malgache pour l’Enseignement Supérieur (CAMES), for francophone Africa, were dissected, and it was ensured that the ASG-QA adopted their principles 
and complemented. Through the extensive promotion of the ASG-QA over the past 6 years, careful attention has been paid to the unique continental dimension that 
the ASG-QA offer, and how they must be seen as one of several instruments that can shape QA systems in Africa, depending on the policy dynamics and frameworks 
of the respective countries and regional economic communities in Africa. The ASG-QA and this User’s Guide are unique African tools, embracing different types of 
HE systems and languages across the continent, in pursuit of a common African higher education space where mobility is a reality and where systems and regions 
become more porous and less siloed. 

Purpose of the Users’ Guide

The aim of this Users’ Guide is to further support the implementation of the ASG-QA by providing practical guidance and explanation, including: 

• clarifications to improve the understanding and interpretation of the ASG-QA, particularly related to aspects of individual standards that have proved challen-
ging in the first years of their use;
• guidance on the implementation of the standards for HEIs and QAAs in the early stages of development;
• examples of how HEIs and QAAs can demonstrate that they are meeting the commitments of the ASG-QA when undergoing internal or external reviews.

Drafting and Consultation Process

In the framework of the HAQAA2 contract, the second phase of HAQAA, this Users’ Guide was drafted by the ASG-QA Task Force, comprising quality assurance 
experts in higher education from Eastern, Western, Northern, Southern and Central Africa. An expert from the European Higher Education Area was also part of 
the team, to offer a reflection and some comparative experiences from Europe. The European Association for Quality Assurance in Higher Education, as part of the 
HAQAA2 Implementing Team, with support of OBREAL Global, coordinated the work of the Task Force. The ASG-QA essentially informed the development of the 
Users’ Guide and, as such, are the main point of reference of the Guide. One activity that contributed further to the development of this document is a report that 
assessed the impact of the pilot QA agency reviews against the ASG-QA (tested in HAQAA1) and the fitness-for-purpose of the review methodology1 used in the pilot 
agency reviews and consultancy visits conducted during the HAQAA1 period. The basis of this report was an analysis of the self-assessment reports produced by the 
agencies and ministries that participated in the pilot reviews and consultancy visits as well as the review panels’ reports on the agency reviews and consultancy visits; 
collection of feedback from the agencies and ministries that participated in a review or consultancy visit; and collection of feedback from the experts that conducted 
the agency reviews and consultancy visits. The collection of feedback in all cases was done through virtual focus groups conducted between April and June 2020. The 

1. During HAQAA1, a review methodology was developed to assess QAAs against the standards of parts B and C of the ASG-QA. In 2019, the methodology was tested through four 
pilot reviews of established QAAs in Africa. In addition, the methodology was used, in part, for four consultancy visits to newly established QAAs or ministries preparing to establish 
an agency.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

3

key findings in this impact assessment report were discussed by the Task Force and informed the elaboration in the Users’ Guide, where applicable.
Several modalities were used to further develop the Users’ Guide: Two groups were formed in the beginning of 2021, each group having worked respectively on Sec-
tion 1 (internal quality assurance of HEIs) and Section 2 (external quality assurance). The initial draft sections were circulated for input amongst the members of the 
Task Force, followed by a critical discussion and reflection in a series of meetings for further comments, input and strengthening of the Users’ Guide.

Additionally, the draft Users’ Guide was shared with a group of ‘HAQAA ambassadors’ in quality assurance in higher education for further input regarding the ap-
propriateness of the general structure and introduction of the document. The HAQAA ambassadors are graduates of training courses that HAQAA has conducted for 
both external and internal QA, nominated by the governments and institutions and competitively selected. They offered examples of good practice/evidence and 
overall feedback on the Guide as a whole. Lastly, the final draft Users’ Guide was submitted to the African Union Commission for consideration and endorsement 
before proceeding to publication.    

Target Croups

The Users’ Guide is aimed at quality assurance practitioners in HEIs and QAAs as well as any organisation and experts that conduct external reviews of QAAs. 

Scope and Applicability

The Users’ Guide is not intended to set out any additional standards or requirements on top of the ASG-QA themselves. Furthermore, the examples given are illus-
trative, non-prescriptive, and non-exhaustive. It should be remembered that the ASG-QA are a set of baseline standards and the enhancement principle of quality 
assurance encourages HEIs and QAAs to go beyond these standards. However, the users of this Guide are encouraged to use it in support of the national and regula-
tory standards in their own countries, where these exist.

The Users’ Guide is structured in the same way as the ASG-QA and should be read in conjunction with that document, which remains the agreed reference for stan-
dards for quality assurance. The interlinkage of the three parts of the ASG-QA should be bore in mind when using the Users’ Guide. Hence, in addressing the standards 
and guidelines in Part A, HEIs should be mindful of the standards and guidelines in Part B that QAAs will apply when conducting external quality reviews at institutions 
so as to ensure that their internal quality assurance systems and processes are aligned with or satisfy external quality assurance criteria and processes. QAAs should 
also give due recognition to the existence of internal quality assurance standards (Part A) used by HEIs when they engage in self-assessments to see to it that their 
internal quality assurance is appropriate to external quality assurance activities they are involved in. Similarly, QAAs should consider the standards and guidelines in 
Part B when they engage in activities to assure their own quality (Part C), because there is a close connection between the two Parts. It is also important to mention 
that Section 1 of the Users’ Guide is rather long, because HEIs have to take custodianship of nurturing and upholding their own quality and, in so doing, have to 
ensure that internal quality assurance is robust enough to prepare themselves for all types of external quality assurance activities such as programme accreditation, 
institutional accreditation, quality audits, reviews, etc. In addition, it includes standards and guidelines for open and distance learning (ODeL).

The implementation of the ASG-QA, complemented by the Users’ Guide, should be seen as a combined effort between HEIs and QAAs at the institutional, national, 
regional and continental levels to strive for harmonisation and a common African higher education space, based on the generic principles of quality assurance and 
quality enhancement.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

4

KEY CONCEPTS AND DEFINITIONS
KEY CONCEPTS

In recent years, and despite the fact that student massification is increasingly prevalent, African higher education institutions have identified the crucial and continuous 
need to assess the level of satisfaction of learners’ and stakeholders’ requirements in order to improve their competitiveness in terms of teaching, research and 
service to society. To this end, the implementation of quality tools and frameworks is a necessity for African higher education to meet the present and future 
challenges in an environment that is profoundly different from the one that has existed in recent decades. To accompany this change, the GSA-QA has been designed, 
and this follow-up document provides practical guidance and explanations to further support the implementation of the GSA-QA. To facilitate its use, a review of the 
key concepts that underpin this work is necessary.

What is quality then? 

Although there is a wealth of definitions in the literature, our choice, which is very subjective, is the one given by Perellon2 in 2003, namely “quality is the adequacy of 
practices to objectives identified by the actors at work, and not to abstract values”. Even if a definition is never neutral, this one, by the fact that it is centred on action, 
and not just on values and beliefs, seems to us to be well adapted to action. Having said that, in 2005, Burla3 thinks that quality could be defined as “a confrontation 
between the needs of students, the priorities of teachers, and the needs of the professional community”; because, in HE, at all stages of quality management, 
effectiveness depends on the active involvement of stakeholders and particularly the client (whether the student or the employer, or any other interested party). In 
fact, even if the word “quality” is unanimously accepted and the notion of quality is, in itself, a unifying concept, implementation requires a paradigm shift impacting 
on practices.

What about quality assurance, which refers to similar practices?

Originally, the aim of quality assurance is to enable the client to have the guarantee that all the means will be implemented to ensure that the service/product 
corresponds to his expectations. Even if the latter is very generic, the specific definition of Ekong4 (1998) which says that “a quality assurance system is a set of actions 

2. Perellon, J.F. (2003), «La qualité dans l’enseignement supérieur», Presses polytechniques et universitaires romandes, coll. «Le savoir suisse», Lausanne, (Switzerland).
3. Quoted in Dejean, J. (2007), «Les démarches qualité dans l’enseignement supérieur, entre évaluation et contrôle», in «Les démarches qualité dans l’enseignement supérieur en Europe», edited by Heldenbergh A., published 
by L’Harmattan, pp. 15-49, Paris, France.
4. Ekongème, D. (1998), “Higher Education in the 21st Century; Vision and Action”, World Conference on Higher Education, UNESCO, Paris, 5-9 October 1998.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

5

and means put in place by an institution with the aim of enabling it to confirm to itself and to others concerned that the necessary conditions have been put in place 
for students to achieve the standards the institution has set for itself” seems relevant. That said, it is worth supplementing it with the definition given by Woodhouse5 
in 1999, namely “the term quality assurance refers to the strategies, procedures, actions and attitudes necessary to ensure that quality is maintained and improved”, 
while recalling that these definitions are carried by the following four main functions: accountability, control, compliance and improvement. From there, and because 
everything is intrinsically linked, the implementation of a systemic vision and a process approach will make it possible to obtain coherent and predictable results in a 
more effective and efficient way, while institutionalising the practice and culture of evaluation and continuous improvement.

Thus, whatever model is chosen or designed, it is necessary to be aware of the particularities of the higher education institution concerned and to integrate the model 
into its context and into the overall vision and mission of the institution in question. Successful implementation requires strong commitment from top management, 
ownership and empowerment, motivated involvement of staff, and the inclusion of all stakeholders, while adhering to ethical rules.

DEFINITIONS

Accreditation: The process of verification or approval of a higher education institution or quality assurance agency by an authorised external organisation, normally 
for a fixed period of time. Accreditation is a recognition of competence.

Corrective action: action to eliminate the cause of a non-conformity and prevent its recurrence.

Learner: a beneficiary acquiring knowledge and developing skills with the help of an educational service.

Improvement: activity carried out to improve the performance of the institution. When the activity carried out is recurrent, it is called continuous improvement.

Quality assurance: Part of quality management aiming to give confidence to stakeholders through compliance with the requirements expressed in a quality framework 
(policy, strategy, procedures, records, evaluation, etc.).

External quality assurance: systematic monitoring and evaluation of the activities of a higher education quality assurance agency and the underlying processes to 
ensure that the requirements set out in a standard are met.

Internal quality assurance: standardised systems within a higher education institution or quality assurance agency that ensure quality and adequacy in relation to 
the requirements of a standard and the objectives of the institution.

5. Woodhouse, D. (1999), “Quality and Quality Assurance”, Quality and Internationalisation in Higher Education, OECD, Paris.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

6

Self-evaluation: evaluation of an institution or agency of its own performance by internal evaluators from within the institution or agency.

Customer: a person or organisation who is likely to receive or who receives a product or service intended for, or requested by, that person or organisation.

Evaluation committee: a group of individuals engaged to carry out an evaluation.

Competence: the ability to apply knowledge and skills to achieve desired results. 

Conformity: satisfaction of a requirement. In contrast, non-conformity is the failure to meet a requirement.

Context of an institution: a combination of internal and external issues that may affect the institution’s approach to setting and achieving its objectives.

Correction: action to eliminate a detected non-conformity.

Evaluation criteria: a set of policies, procedures, or requirements used as a reference against which objective evidence is compared.

Effectiveness: the level of achievement of planned activities and expected results. When an institution achieves its objectives, it is said to be effective.

Efficiency: the ratio of the result obtained to the resources used. The more the institution rationalises its expenditure and resources, while achieving its objectives, 
the more efficient it is.

Recording: A document that records the results achieved or provides evidence of the completion of a task or activity.

Evaluation: a methodical, independent and documented process of obtaining objective evidence and evaluating it objectively to determine the extent to which 
criteria are met.

External evaluation: an in-depth evaluation carried out in a quality assurance agency by a team of qualified persons who are not staff of the agency.

Higher education institution (HEI): university, college, institute or other organisation providing higher education.

External evaluator: an individual contracted for an assignment and attached to the team evaluating the higher education institution or agency. The evaluator must 
be external to the institution or agency, and have the necessary skills for the task.

Requirement: a stated need or expectation, usually implicit or mandatory. 

Expert: a person who brings specific knowledge or expertise to the evaluation team.

Guideline: a general line of action and guidance to be followed, on the basis of which the benchmarks and requirements to be met will be set. Guidelines guide future decisions.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

7

Quality management: coordinated activities to guide and direct an institution with regard to quality. 

Mission: the purpose, mandate and scope of an institution’s activities, as formulated by the regulatory framework and/or by management.

ISO 45001: Occupational health and safety management systems - Requirements and guidelines for their use.

ISO 17025: General requirements for the competence of testing and calibration laboratories.

Quality objective: the result to be achieved in relation to quality.

Organisation: a person or group of people with a role with the responsibilities, authority and relationships to achieve its objectives.

Interested party or stakeholder: a person or body that can either influence a decision or activity, or be influenced or feel influenced by a decision or activity.

Staff: People working for and within the institution. The staff of a higher education institution includes teachers, researchers, administrative and technical staff and 
those responsible for health and safety.

Evaluation plan: description of the activities and arrangements necessary to carry out the evaluation.

Quality policy: The intentions and orientations of an institution with regard to quality, as officially formulated by its management. The quality policy is translated 
into decisions.

Procedure: A specified way of carrying out an activity or process.

Process: A set of interrelated or interacting activities that uses inputs to produce an expected result. A process must add value.

Project: a single process consisting of a set of coordinated and controlled activities with start and finish dates, undertaken to achieve an objective in accordance with 
specific requirements, including time, cost and resource constraints.

External evaluation report: The main outcome of the evaluation of a higher education institution or agency in the form of a document written by the evaluation 
committee detailing the evaluation.

Reference: Refers to the specification of aspects, elements or principles with which a programme, higher education institution or quality assurance agency must 
comply and against which quality is assessed.

Risk: the effect of uncertainty on the achievement of objectives.

Strategy: a plan to achieve a long-term or overall goal. It is the plan for achieving the institution’s vision. The strategy is broken down into actions.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

8

Quality management system: A set of interrelated or interacting quality-related elements of an organisation used to establish policies, objectives and processes to 
achieve those objectives.

Validation: confirmation by evidence that the requirements for a specific use or intended application have been met.

Verification: confirmation by evidence that the specified requirements have been met.

Vision: an aspiration of what an institution wishes to become, as formulated by the management.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

9

SECTION 1
QUALITY ASSURANCE FOR HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTIONS
(PART A OF ASG-QA)

Section 1 of the User’s Guide is addressed to HEIs. In line with the principle that HEIs have the primary responsibility for the quality of their provision and quality 
assurance thereof, Part A presents standards and guidelines for IQA at the level of the institutions, and also incorporates standards and guidelines for ODeL modes. 

The standards and guidelines cover aspects of the institution and of institutional activity that are essential to contribute to a high-quality education environment. 
Fulfilling these standards helps to ensure that an institution takes on its own responsibility for the quality assurance of its activities. 

Part A of the ASG-QA covers a range of topics, including: institutional governance, policies and processes that promote quality higher education; teaching and 
learning environment; research and innovation; collaboration and community engagement.

The exact manner of implementation of the standards will depend on the context of the higher education institution. For examples, implementation will vary 
depending on: the type of institution (level and discipline of education offered, scope of activities, size and structure, legal format…), the modality of education (on-
site, online or blended education; local or transnational…) and operating context (national higher education and quality assurance legal frameworks, existing national 
or regional standards).

The aim of Part A of the ASG-QA is to provide quality higher education in line with set course requirements, vision and mission of the institution and the overarching 
goal of higher education.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

10

STANDARD 1. VISION, MISSION AND STRATEGIC OBJECTIVES

Standard Examples of good practice / Evidence
The institution shall have published vision and mission statements that reflect its commitment 
to continuous quality enhancement; strategic objectives and clear policies and procedures 
that are consistent with its vision and mission.

Guidelines

The institutional vision, mission and strategic objectives: 

a) are publicly disclosed; reflect the aspirations and needs of stakeholders, and indicate 
strategic development plans and targets. 

b) concerning QA, are translated into clear policies and strategic plans, which are 
operationalised into achievable goals. 

• Quality policy and commitment of the presidency drafted, posted and communicated to all 
stakeholders of the institution.

The institution ensures that there is a robust and well-functioning QA system for its 
entire activities (academic, research and community engagement), and that facilitates 
the coordination of the approval of policies, procedures and mechanisms. The institution, 
therefore, ensures that: 

a) the vision and mission statements and strategic objectives reflect commitment to 
quality enhancement;

• The institution has a strategic plan with its vision, missions and values, with a SWOT analysis 
and planning of the actions to be taken to implement a quality management system.
• Internal audits are planned, implemented and maintained. 
• The scope, internal evaluation guidelines, areas and fields of evaluation are defined in advance.

b) Various forms of planning (for example, strategic, institutional, academic, and financial) 
are coordinated to ensure the quality of academic outcomes; 

• Strategic planning is aligned with the institution’s policy, and is visible in the institution’s 
implementation plan.
• The information system is available and accessible to all actors within the institution.
• Minutes of meetings and briefings are documented, kept, distributed and made available 
for consultation.
• Planning is updated in response to planned and unplanned change requirements; all resulting 
information is documented and retained.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

11

c) Medium and long-term plans reflect the programmes being offered, as well as its research 
focus to ensure sustainability and continuous improvement;

• Operational activities are aligned with institutional plans and are visible in the Institution’s 
implementation plan or in the strategic documents of the faculties.
• Education programmes are developed and validated by the appropriate bodies as proof of 
their alignment with the strategic objectives.
• Education and research programme are visible, accessible to all stakeholders in the institution 
digitally or in hard copy.
• Education and research programme evaluations are planned and regularly carried out, 
documented and kept as evidence of monitoring results.
• Following education and research programme evaluation, actions are implemented for 
improvement; the effectiveness of these actions is measured and analysed.

d) The formulation of the plans is collegial, they promote a high degree of institutional 
integrity and responsiveness to change, and they are known to stakeholders; and 

• Decrees setting up scientific committees, scientific councils, faculty councils, university 
councils, boards of directors, etc.
• Minutes and reports of meetings of scientific committees, scientific council, faculty council, 
university council, board of directors, etc. All the information derived from them is kept.
• Updating of planning follows planned and unplanned change requirements; all resulting 
information is documented and retained.
• Relevant information is communicated to all stakeholders through the various channels 
(email, mail, flyer, etc.).

e) There is continuous and periodic monitoring, evaluation and benchmarking of processes, 
including self-assessment of academic programmes and institutional self-assessment for 
purposes of continual improvement.

• Evaluation criteria and scope are defined; evaluators selected are qualified, impartial and 
objective.
• Internal evaluations (institutional and programmatic) are regularly planned and implemented.
• Indicators are put in place and analysed regularly to identify areas for improvement.
• Results of evaluations are documented and communicated to managers and actions are 
planned and implemented.
• Documented information is kept as evidence of programme implementation and evaluation 
results.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

12

STANDARD 2. GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT 

Standard Focus Points – Guiding Questions Examples of good practice – Evidence
The institution shall have clearly stated governance 
and management structures. This will ensure sound 
and ethical governance and management, including 
robust QA practices that support the achievement of its 
mission and legal mandate.

Guidelines

The institution: 

a) has qualified, competent and experienced leadership 
to oversee the development and management of a 
quality culture within the institution; 

b) has relevant governance and management bodies, such 
as the University Council, Senate, Management Board, 
Student Body; and various committees, each with a clear 
mandate, duties, responsibilities, powers, privileges and 
tenure; and these bodies are properly coordinated to 
ensure efficiency, effectiveness and quality; 

1. How do your governance and management structures 
look like? Are they aligned with national and regulatory 
standards?

2. Do the relevant bodies have clearly defined mandates, 
functions and responsibilities? If so, describe the functions 
and responsibilities of the relevant bodies.

3. To what extent are students involved in these bodies? 

4. Please provide information on the qualifications and 
experience of your institution’s management. Also provide 
information on their age and gender and how inclusiveness 
and internationalization are taken in account in the 
recruitment process?

• Refer to the organisation chart of your institution
• Refer to the statutes of the institution
• Authorities and responsibilities documented and communicated 
(job descriptions, employment contracts, etc.)
• Job profiles for top management position
• Selection process of top management position

c) Has a QA policy and structure, which flow down 
through all levels; 

5. If your institution has a quality assurance policy, what is 
the procedure for its operation?

• Attach the relevant quality policy as evidence
• Formal existence of a quality assurance unit (ministerial or 
internal decision)
• Budgetary allocation to the QA unit 



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

13

d) Has clear communication systems and networks for 
the promotion of internal and external information 
dissemination for public accountability; 

6. If your institution has a communication strategy, how 
does it work?

• Attach the respective strategy as evidence

e) Makes responsible use of its autonomy; 

f) Has policies and procedures for the delegation of 
authority, whenever needed; 

g) Enables students to participate in decision-making in 
relevant governance bodies; 

7. To what extent are students involved in these bodies? • Composition and review of bodies; inclusion of students as 
permanent members or as guests
• Duration of student mandate
• Student Selection Process (nomination or election)

h) Ensures regular consultations with stakeholders, 
reports and follows up actions on key issues of policy and 
operations to promote quality, cohesion, harmony and 
identity within the institution; 

8. What are the topics of the regular consultations with 
key stakeholders?

• Identify relevant stakeholders
• Attach market survey/graduate exit satisfaction survey/tracer 
study reports as evidence of regular consultations with stakeholders  

i) Emphasises ethics, transparency, and academic 
integrity throughout its teaching, learning and 
research activities;  

j) Promotes a high degree of institutional integrity and 
responsiveness by advocating and demonstrating honesty 
and non-discrimination in its treatment of staff, students 
and members of the public and in the management of 
institutional affairs; 



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

14

k) Publishes and disseminates on a regular basis, 
impartial and objective qualitative and quantitative 
information about courses offered, research undertaken 
and community services;

9. Where is this information published? • Proposed programmes, research results, community engagement 
documented, and communicated (flyer, institution website, social 
networks, etc.)

l) Has developed and implemented effective processes 
for deterring, detecting and dealing with misconduct by 
students or staff; 

m) Has policies and activated procedures to manage 
conflict of interest; and 

10. What kind of procedures are in place to manage conflicts 
of interest and to deal with staff and student conduct?

• Existence of a conflict resolution policy 
• Procedure in case of conflict of interest
• Compliance with the legal and regulatory framework
• Existence of a charter and an ethics (and conflict 
management) council
• Existence of an anti-corruption policy
• Existence of an equal-opportunity policy

n) Has effective, systematic, timely and fair processes for 
the investigation of complaints, grievances and appeals 
by students, staff and other stakeholders.

• Formalised complaints and appeals procedure, accessible and 
communicated to staff and students



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

15

STANDARD 3: HUMAN RESOURCES

Standard Focus Points – Guiding Questions Examples of good practice / Evidence
The institution shall have policies on human resources 
that are inclusive, and that ensure recruitment and 
retention of adequate numbers of qualified and 
competent staff to achieve its mission and carry out its 
legal mandate.

Guidelines

The quality of staff is the key to the quality of the higher 
education institution and, therefore, it:

a) Has `clear policies and procedures that ensure equal 
opportunities and actual gender equality in human 
resources for recruitment, retention, and promotion of 
staff that is based on qualification, competence and skills;

1. How does the HEI demonstrate that its staff 
(academic, administrative and support/technical) has the 
required qualifications, experience and skills to support 
accomplishment of its mission, goals and objectives? 

• HR policy (recruitment, retention, career development, etc.)
• Performance management system
• Staff performance agreements and personal development plans
• Written reports/records of staff performance appraisals, workload 
and qualification adherence
• Staff employment contracts
• Staff CVs
• Staff structure
• Examples of approved job specifications
• Existence of a HR department
• Existence of a full-time HR Officer

2. How does institutional policies and strategies for human 
resource management ensure that sufficient numbers of 
qualified staff are deployed to meet human resource needs 
in the institution?



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

16

3. What policies and procedures does the institution have 
in place to ensure fairness in staff employment, promotion 
and retention, including how are the aforementioned 
implemented?

• Staff promotion policy
• Staff appraisal policy
• Training and development policy and plan
• Staff development activity reports; documented records of 
progress on staff development/career development opportunities
• Promotion-staff satisfaction survey reports as well as audit reports 
against set guidelines on promotions, employment qualifications 

4. What systems are in place to manage recruitment, 
appointment, record-keeping (full-time and part-time staff 
numbers, staff qualifications, staff turnover rates, etc.), 
employment equity, compensation and benefits?

5. How are the various systems integrated to ensure a 
comprehensive human resource provision? 

• Evidence of the use of a management information system for 
integration purposes

6. How well do all systems operate? • Regular reports on the operation of the systems

7. What risks and challenges has the institution 
encountered in implementing these systems?

• Risk Management Reporting

8. What steps has the institution taken to mitigate risk?

b) Has a core of full-time staff and keeps up-to-date 
records of staff numbers, qualifications and employment 
turnover rates;

9. How many full-time and part-time academic and 
administrative staff are employed?  

10.What strategies are in place to retain staff in scarce 
fields?

• Policy for recruitment of part-time academic staff, and provision in 
the policy for scarcity areas
• Academic work-load policy

11. What are the staff turnover rates/ ratios and what are 
the reasons for the status quo?

• Regular reports on staff retention/turnover 

12. What succession planning/strategy does the institution 
have in place to ensure that the institution continues to run 
smoothly or without interruption after staff in key positions 
left the institution?

• Succession planning/strategy
• Minutes of management board meetings indicating discussion on 
staff retention/turnovers 



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

17

c) Has clear policies and procedures for continuous staff 
development;

13. How does the staff continuously engage in professional 
growth opportunities provided by the institution, and 
how does the institution promote staff development 
programmes and opportunities that are inclusive and fair?

• Staff performance contracts should capture individualised plans 
on professional growth
• Commitment to staff development should be indicated by a 
budgetary allocation for this
• Training and development opportunities and selection of 
beneficiaries
• Any benchmark for full-time faculty-student ratio and staff-full-
time faculty ratio

14. What systems are in place to manage staff training and 
development?

• Existence of a committee to manage staff training and development
• Budget allocation for this purpose

d) Has clear contractual agreements with staff that 
outline the conditions of employment and are aligned 
with any legislative requirements of the country of the 
institution;

15. How does the institution ensure that staff know their 
conditions of employment?

• Staff handbooks/manuals

16. How does the institution ensure that staff contracts are 
in line with national labour laws?

• Minutes of management board meetings indicating regular 
compliance reports discussed

17. How does the institution adhere to these legislative 
requirements?

• Minutes of management board meetings indicating regular 
discussion on adherence/non adherence to legislative requirements 

e) Provides adequate staff support facilities and services; 18. How does the institution create a conducive work 
environment to support and meet the needs of staff, 
including the types of staff support services available, e.g., 
customer service, general administrative support, staff 
wellbeing, office space, meeting rooms, etc. to help staff 
achieve institutional goals and objectives?

• Policies in place on conducive work environment
• Maintenance policy for staff support

f) Undertakes periodic monitoring, evaluation, and 
appraisal of staff; and

19. What is the academic staff workload and what are the 
reasons for the status quo?

• Academic staff workload policy
• Regular audit reports on academic staff workload

20. What mechanisms are in place to manage staff 
performance and do staff appraisals? How regularly are 
these conducted?

• Records of staff performance appraisal reports



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

18

g) Adheres to (local/regional) norms for student-faculty 
ratios that promote student-centered learning.

21. What are the student-faculty ratios and what are the 
reasons for the status quo?

• Regular audit reports on student-faculty ratios

22. Why are the particular ratios used and how do they 
support student-centered learning?

• Audit reports indicating compliance to policies/set standards and 
guidelines on student-faculty ratios 



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

19

STANDARD 4: FINANCIAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 

Standard Focus  Points – Guiding Questions Examples of good practice – Evidence

The institution shall have adequate financial resources 
and prudent financial management that are aligned to 
its mission, objectives and mandate to ensure quality 
education.

Guidelines

Financial sustainability is the backbone of any institution, 
and adequate financial resources and prudent financial 
management should be conducted within an approved 
framework of institutional strategies, policies and 
procedures, which enable the institution to meet its 
financial needs to ensure quality academic outcomes. 
The institution has:

1. How does the institution ensure that the resource base 
is prudently managed based on sound financial planning 
and drafting of clear budgets for all the activities that 
the institution undertakes, in compliance with its vision, 
mission and goals?

• Financial and Accounting Procedures Manual

a) Adequate financial resources to carry out its mandate 
and objectives effectively and efficiently;

2. Does the institution have an appropriate and reliable 
financial resource base to deliver sustainable quality 
education?

b) A diversified financial and sustainable resource 
base, and ensures a balanced allocation of resources to 
core functions of teaching and learning, research, and 
community engagement;

• Sources of funding; public / government, private, student fees, 
grants, non-core income generated from other activities
• Accounts held by the institution, segregated by type and purpose



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

20

c) A prudent financial management system, which 
includes strategies, policies and procedures 
for budgeting, resource allocation, repairs and 
maintenance of infrastructure, asset management, 
debt management and financial reporting;

• Risk and debt management strategies
• Financial allocation policies and procedures
• Financial planning policies and procedures
• Budget preparation policies and procedures
• Policies and procedures regarding the revenues and expenses 
(and investment, if any) 
• Budget/funds allocation for research programmes
• Budget allocation for improvement plans arising from programme 
evaluations

d) A system to address the risks, gaps and challenges 
identified for continuous improvement; and

3. Do the laid down plans incorporate potential risk 
management strategies?

• Financial risk management analysis reports

e) Monitoring, evaluation (through financial audits) and 
benchmarking processes for the financial management 
system using international best practices or some other 
basis of accounting appropriate for the institution.

4. Can the institution provide evidence of accountable and 
transparent financial management that follows established 
financial procedures?

• External financial audit reports
• Audit and risk committee
• Existence of an internal control system
• Internal audit reports (should include financial matters)



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

21

STANDARD 5. INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES 

Standard Examples of good practice / Evidence
The institution shall have adequate and appropriate infrastructure, 
facilities and resources to support teaching, learning and research. 

Guidelines

For a good higher education experience, institutions provide a range 
of resources to assist students’ learning. Infrastructure and facilities 
are in line with the goals and aims of the higher education institution, 
the programmes on offer, the teaching and learning strategy, as well as 
research. The institution has:

a) Academic, administrative and recreational facilities (lecture theatres, 
seminar rooms, staff offices, laboratories, studios, workshops, etc.) 
adequate for the number of students and staff; 

• Number of offices, number of rooms, number of lecture theatres, number of laboratories, number of meeting 
rooms, etc. (in relation to the number of teachers and students)
• Existence and size of recreation areas, car parking lots, etc.
• Existence of ramps or lifts to facilitate access to facilities 
• Existence circulation plan made visible and available to all
• The premises are equipped to increase the effectiveness of teaching activities (comfortable and recent furniture, 
video projector, computer, etc.).
• The preventive maintenance of the secondary trades of the premises and teaching areas (electricity, heating, air 
conditioning, humidity, etc.) must be strategically planned and implemented.
• The architecture and layout of the premises must be compatible with the type of training and facilitate exchanges.
• The infrastructure must be designed in such a way that the spaces promote creativity, communication and conviviality.
• Teachers must have a work space and student reception areas that are optimal and meet ergonomic requirements.
• The organisation and layout of the premises must take into account the specificity of each field of training.
• The environmental conditions of the premises and teaching areas (electricity, heating, air conditioning, humidity, 
etc.) must be controlled so as not to disrupt either the smooth running of lessons and assessments or the 
socialisation of learners.
• Laboratory testing facilities, including but not limited to power sources, lighting and environmental conditions, 
must be adequate to facilitate the adequate execution of tests.
• The laboratory shall monitor, control and record environmental conditions in accordance with the requirements 
of relevant specifications, methods and procedures, or where they influence the quality of results.
• In laboratories, adjacent areas where there are incompatible activities should be separated.
• Existence of a permanent unit, fully equipped and fully manned for the maintenance and repairs of equipment 
and facilities
• Availability of maintenance contract, system audit of infrastructure
• Location plan and directional signs of classes and labs and other facilities are available
• Provision of IT equipment and software to staff and students. 
• Availability of policy for the renewal of IT equipment for staff



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

22

b) A properly organised library equipped with facilities and resources 
(physical and/or electronic); adequate for the number of students and 
staff; 

• Existence of a library which is accessible and open throughout the day, adapted to the number of students and 
which respects the rules and requirements in terms of comfort, hygiene and ergonomics
• Existence of a system for managing and facilitating searches of the documentary resources
• Existence of soundproofed work rooms in the library.

c) Adequate Information and Communication Technology (ICT) 
infrastructure, including affordable, high speed and dedicated 
connectivity. 

• Provision of a distance learning platform.
• The infrastructure dedicated to distance learning meets the normative requirements in terms of safety, hygiene 
and comfort
• The planning of activities and its updating follows a strategy and planned and unplanned needs for change; all 
resulting information is documented and kept. 
• Reliable, high-speed internet access
• Dedicated policy and procedures for the design and implementation of distance learning
• Sufficient and appropriate infrastructure to ensure technical support in terms of server space, redundancy or 
load balancing
• IT plan to ensure maintenance and upgrading of ICT
• Competent and reliable technical services in terms of backup and remote services
• Resources to develop teachers’ knowledge and skills in ICT
• Rules of procedure to ensure privacy, security and safety of data and any relevant confidential information
• Access to training for off-campus or virtual students
• Budget for IT infrastructure and related services

d) d’installations conformes aux dispositions nationales pertinentes en 
matière de santé et de sécurité ; et

• Existence of a safety register of facilities and equipment (approved by the authorities)
• Reports of technical visits to the facilities 
• Health, Safety and Environment Unit
• Compliance with safety standards in terms of fire-fighting (fire extinguishers, fire hydrants, rescue teams, etc.) 
• Compliance with health and safety rules in accordance with ISO 45001
• Specific maintenance procedures for laboratories and workshops
• Measures are taken, communicated and implemented in the event of a pandemic or any risk of contamination
• Compliance with the requirements of ISO 17025 for testing laboratories (educational and research)
• The location of buildings and various areas (car parks, storage areas, etc.) is linked to the traffic plan and to the 
major risks identified (fire, explosion, toxicity, etc.)
• The physical environments (noise, lighting, air quality, etc.) in the practical laboratories require particular attention 
and care to guarantee health and safety conditions for students, teachers and staff

e) Facilities accessible for persons with disabilities. • Physical existence of access ramps (with slope respecting the standards) to all spaces (educational, research, 
administration, library, etc.)
• Physical existence of lifts for all high spaces (educational, research, administration, library, etc.).
• Essential information must be accessible to people with disabilities (for the hearing impaired, blind, mobility 
impaired, etc.).
• The institution must limit the number of pedestrian routes with a difference in level to facilitate access for the 
disabled.
• Maintenance policy for all these infrastructure/facilities
• Master plans



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

23

In the case of E-learning, the institution ensures: 

a) Sufficient infrastructure to address technical support in terms of: 

i. Server space, 
ii. Redundancy or load balancing,
iii. Technical help desk, 
iv. Reliable internet access, and 
v. Reliable technical services in terms of back-up and remote ser-

vices; and
vi. Resources to develop the knowledge and skills of their ICT prac-

titioners. 

b) That it has an ICT plan for purposes of: 

i. Maintaining and upgrading of technologies; and
ii. Ensuring reliability, privacy, safety and security. 

c) That there is consistency and coherency of the technical framework for students 
and academic staff, which ensures that any change in technology is introduced in a 
way that minimises its impact on students and academic staff. 

Therefore, the institution has: 

i. A clear structure for communicating changes in software pro-
grammes, hardware or technical system / procedure when a 
student or staff proceeds from one course to another,

ii. A training programme / process for both staff and students 
when new software or a new system is adopted,

iii. Access to training by off-campus or virtual students, and iv. 
Learning policy on new software when a student or tutor pro-
ceeds from one course to another. 

d) That hardware, software and technical support are an important element of 
e-learning and, therefore, the institution has the following in place: 

i. A help desk that operates 24 hours and 7 days a week, 
ii. A system for monitoring and supporting a range of hardware / 

software, 

Clearly stated technical expectations, iv. A system for Frequently Asked Questions 
(FAQs), which should be assessed and feedback given to students.

• Existence of a permanent unit, fully equipped and fully manned for the maintenance and repairs of equipment 
and facilities
• Availability of maintenance contract, system audit of infrastructure
• Location plan and directional signs of classes and labs and other facilities are available
• Provision of IT equipment and software to staff and students
• Availability of policy for the renewal of IT equipment for staff



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

24

STANDARD 6. STUDENT RECRUITMENT, ADMISSION, CERTIFICATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

 Standard Focus Points – Guiding Questions Examples of good practice / Evidence 
The institution shall have pre-defined, published and consistently 
applied policies and procedures that ensure fair and equitable 
recruitment and admission, progression, certification and support 
services through all phases of the student’s lifecycle, and in issues 
concerning students’ future employability.

The institution shall have documented policies and strategies that 
promote students’ welfare and guidance in curricular, vocational and 
personal areas. 

Guidelines

Providing conditions and support that are necessary for students to 
make progress in their academic career is in the best interests of the 
individual students, programmes and institutions. It is vital to have fit-
for-purpose admission, recognition and completion procedures. 

Therefore, the institution has clear guidelines and strategies:

(a) For marketing/promoting the institution and its programmes, 
recruitment, admission, selection and registration;

(b) That promote diversity in admission, including gender 
mainstreaming and consideration of disadvantaged groups and 
persons with disabilities, where applicable;

(c) That ensure that students admitted meet minimum general and 
programme-specific entry requirements;

(d) That ensure monitoring, evaluation and benchmarking for 
improvement of enrolment management;

(e) That guarantee continual collection and compilation of data on 
students’ admission, progress and performance, and graduation rates;

a) Student Recruitment and Admission

1. Does the institution have clearly formulated admission 
criteria for undergraduate and postgraduate programmes?
2. Where selection is done, are the procedures and criteria 
clear, adequate and transparent? What are the requirements? 
How do prospective students acquire the information on the 
said selection mode?
3. Are the planned study load for the programmes on offer in 
line with the actual study load that students undertake?
4. How do you analyse the development of the student 
admission?
5. What mechanisms are in place to effect the quality and 
size / capacity of the admissions, and how effective are these 
mechanisms? Can an average student complete the study 
programme in the planned time?
6. Is admission criteria in line with local requirements and/or 
legislations, if any?
7. Is there any appeal mechanism regarding admission?

• Admission, equivalence and transfer policies
• Policies and procedures on the transfer of students and 
equivalence of courses
• Documentation on student admission, graduation, transfer and 
equivalence of courses
• The role of councils and their responsibility for implementing, 
and following up teaching and learning policies.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

25

(f) That promote student retention and progression, and 
address issues concerning drop-out rates;

b) Certification

8. Does the institution have a structured monitoring 
system for collecting information on drop out and 
success rates among students in the institutional 
programmes offered?

9. Is the average time for graduation in line with the 
planned time for finishing the programmes in the 
institution?

10. How are the final qualifications achieved by the 
graduates aligned to the formulated expected learning 
outcomes of the study programmes in the institution, 
and are they recognized by professional bodies and 
employers?

11. How does the institution take cognizance of national 
policies and legislation regarding the recognition of 
qualifications gained by students locally, regionally and 
internationally?

12. What percentage of graduates get employed within 
two years after graduation?

13. Are the content and level of the graduation projects 
in line with the degree awarded (Bachelors / Masters / 
Doctorate)?

14. How does the institution assure that the graduates 
are able to operate adequately in the field for which 
they have been trained?

• Regulations and procedures for testing and grading
• Analysis of students’ admission against annual dropout rates 
and graduation statistics
• Policies and procedures of graduation requirements for 
undergraduate programmes
• Policies and procedures of graduation requirements for the 
higher diploma and the Master’s and Doctoral programmes, such 
as the proficiency examination for the doctoral programmes, the 
comprehensive examination for the master’s programmes, and 
any other requirements
• Regulations and procedures for the preparation of dissertations 
and theses
• Adherence to the time limits specified for the offered 
programmes
• Annual statistics of graduation records for all levels of 
programmes offered in the institution
• Percentage of graduates being employed in the profession 
within six months upon graduation for the last five years.
• Graduates monitoring policy

(g) That ensure rigorous processes for issuance and storage of 
certificates; and



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

26

(h) That ensure storage of detailed records and transcripts, indicating 
the list of courses, units and grades. The needs of a diverse student 
population (such as mature, part-time, employed and international 
students as well as students with disabilities) and the shift towards 
student-centred learning and flexible modes of learning and teaching, 
are taken into account when allocating, planning and providing 
learning resources and student support. Support services may be 
organized in a variety of ways depending on the institutional context. 
However, the internal quality assurance ensures that all resources are 
fit-for-purpose, accessible, and that students are informed about the 
services available to them. 

Students need guidance, and appropriate provision is made to advise 
and assist them in curricular, vocational and personal domains. 
Adequate provision is made for infor mation and advice to potential 
students during the application and enrolment phases. 

The institution has guidelines for the promotion of students’ 
learning by:

(a) Advising them on academic issues;

c) Student Services
Guidance and counselling: 

15. How are students made aware of their rights and 
responsibilities while undertaking their study programmes?

16. What policies, regulations and procedures are in place 
for psychological and social counselling? How are these 
implemented?

17. Does the institution have specific units / centres set for 
student counselling and guidance, and what entails counselling 
and guidance in your institution?

18. What mechanisms are in place for support and follow-up of 
learners with specific learning difficulties?

19. How does the institution ensure development of 
independent skills of learners?

20. How does the institution ensure successful student 
progression from one level of education to the next higher 
level, and how are learners assured of gainful employment 
thereafter?

• Policies, regulations and procedures of raising student 
awareness
• Policies and regulations concerning the rights and responsibilities 
of students
• Psychological and social counselling procedures
• Vocational guidance procedures
• Provision of organizational units or offices concerned with 
student guidance and counselling
• Student guidance and counselling activities and periodic  
students’ evaluation of the same
• Training courses directed toward students development of 
independent skills
• Clearly specified roles and responsibility for academic and 
personal counselling
• Provision of orientation to learners on the desired learning skills 
for pursuing the study programmes
• The role of committees and councils in student guidance and 
counselling
• Plans for development and follow-up of student guidance and 
counselling
• Provision of opportunities for leaners to progress both vertically 
and horizontally
• Career guidance advice provided for learners



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

27

Communication with Students / Graduates

21. How is the information flow to potential students 
organized? Is sufficient attention paid to the 
requirements of their educational backgrounds?

22. What are the mechanisms of identifying student 
problems in the study programmes and what action 
is taken to remedy and / or prevent them for affected 
students or in the programme development?

23. How are students advised on problems concerning 
course options, change of options, interruption or 
termination of studies, practical training or final project 
work?

24. Is information provided on career prospects? Do 
students have the opportunity to familiarize themselves 
with the labour market by means of practical training, 
application courses and such like options?

25. What role do staff members play in informing and 
coaching students, and integrating students into the 
study programmes?

26. To what extent do the structure and organization of 
the study programmes contribute to students taking an 
active study approach?

• Procedures for strengthening the institution’s relationship with 
the graduate
• The graduates’ representation on governance boards and 
committees
• Coordination and cooperation with employers and employing 
bodies
• Statistics of the participation of graduates in educational 
activities of the institution
• Exit surveys of graduates upon completion of the programmes 
offered
• Opinion polls oriented toward graduates and employers
• Statistics of alumni activities and number of their participants

(b) Advising them on financial matters;

(c) Providing health and personal counselling services; and 27. What policies, regulations and procedures are in 
place for psychological and social counseling? How are 
they implemented?

•  Psychological and social counseling procedures



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

28

(d) Providing career guidance.  

The institution supports and develops appropriate strategies 
for the creation and functioning of cultural, artistic and sports 
facilities and associations.

28. What procedures are there to assure the quality 
of the student support activities, such as: tutoring 
system, student advice and or counselling, student 
accommodation, health services, and sporting facilities?

•	 Regulation of student elections and procedures
•	 Regulation of student grants and loans and procedures, and 

number of students benefitting from these
•	 Regulation followed in the provision of support services, and 

their procedures
•	 The institution’s policy adopted for extra-curricular activities, 

and statistics of the activities and number of their participants
•	 The role of student clubs in supporting services, the number 

of clubs and their objectives and quality
•	 Following up support services’ performance and 

development
•	 Surveys of student views toward services such as 

accommodation, sports, health, restaurants, banks and 
bookshops

•	 Mechanisms for looking into student complaints and how 
the students benefit from these



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

29

STANDARD 7. DESIGN, APPROVAL, MONITORING AND EVALUATION OF STUDY PROGRAMMES

Standard Focus Points – Guiding Questions Examples of good practice / Evidence
The institution shall have policies and systems that 
ensure the design and development, monitoring and 
evaluation of quality, relevant study programmes that are 
learning outcomes-based and aligned with the needs of 
stakeholders; and that contribute to the achievement of 
its mission, and are commensurate with national, regional 
and international standards.

In the case of ODL, the provider shall have in place 
mechanisms for pre-testing or piloting the learning 
materials to ensure that they are at the learners’ level and 
that the learners will be able to use them without difficulty.

Guidelines

The institution:

Design of study programmes is based on sound educational principles 
and provides a coherent and interactive series of learning experiences 
that develop knowledge, skills and competencies aligned to learning 
outcomes appropriate to the qualification level. The qualification 
resulting from a study programme should be clearly specified 
and communicated, and refer to the correct level of the national 
qualifications framework for higher education and, consequently, to 
the Framework for Qualifications at regional and international levels. 
The approval process follows laid down policies and procedures of the 
institution, regulatory agency and professional bodies.

An institution should have a monitoring and evaluation system to collect 
information about the quality of its study programmes. The monitoring 
and evaluation system should at least include: student evaluations, 
staff course / module / programme reviews, a student progress system, 
dropout and pass rates, structured feedback from the labour market, 
and structured feedback from the alumni.

(a) Has policies, procedures and processes for introducing 
new programmes with learning outcomes and that are 
competence-based, and for amending or phasing out 
standing programmes and programmes are subject to 
continuous monitoring and evaluation (including periodic 
external review) and development to ensure currency, 
quality and relevance;

Design and Approval of Study Programmes

1. Does the institution have clear standards for curriculum, module, or 
course design and development?

2. Who initiates the introduction of new programmes? What procedures 
are in place, and are they clearly documented and followed?

3. Who is involved in the designing, approval and implementation of the 
quality assurance procedures and what does this entail?

4. Why and when does the institution decide to launch a new programme?

5. Is each course unit or module designed with the learning outcomes of 
the programme and qualification level in mind?

6. Are innovative, interactive and engaging features embedded in the 
online, blended and face-to-face curricula?

7. Is the curriculum design coherent? Does it develop disciplinary and 
generic skills progressively over the duration of the study programme?

•	 Policies and procedures on introducing, developing, revising and 
terminating study programmes

•	 Admission and graduation policies and procedures
•	 Policies and procedures on the transfer of students and equivalence 

of courses
•	 On- going improvement of the learning and teaching methods
•	 Integrated relationship between faculty members and the staff working 

at the library and databases
•	 The role of councils and their responsibility for implementing, and 

following up teaching and learning policies
•	 Publishing all expected intended learning outcomes of all study 

programmes
•	 Clarity and integration of the study plans of offered programmes
•	 Degree of compatibility of programs with the vision, mission, and goals 

of the institution
•	 Student orientation and academic advising programs



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

30

Monitoring and Evaluation of Study Programmes 

8. How is continuous improvement of programmes assured?

9. How do you build the system of monitoring to enhance your 
internal quality assurance system (IQAS)?

10. What kind of relevant data feed the process of periodic 
reviews?

11. How often are courses, modules or programmes reviewed? 
Do the reviews evaluate support services, resources and staffing? 
Why have you decided for these monitoring and review intervals, 
no longer or not shorter?

12. How are periodic reviews organized?

13. How do you ensure transparent structure of responsibilities 
and tasks?

14. Is the workload of periodic reviews an issue?

15. Have programme changes introduced on the basis of periodic 
reviews affected its original purpose? Its resources?

16. Do programme aims, intended learning outcomes, assessment 
strategy and teaching methods need to change as a result of the 
reviews?

17. How do you check the appropriateness of learning environment 
and support services for the purpose of programme delivery? 

18. How do you communicate the results of monitoring and 
periodic reviews?

19. s anything done with the results, and how transparent is the 
implementation of the reviewed results?

•	 Continuous improvement plans
•	 Policies and procedures for evaluating and developing curricula 

on a regular basis
•	 Policies and procedures for monitoring the quality assurance of 

inputs, processes and outputs of proposed programs
•	 Policy for evaluation of teaching/learning 
•	 Policies on the process and procedures for evaluating the 

performance of students and faculty members
•	 Documented changes and implementation in courses/modules 

and programs based on feedback from IQA committees, 
student-staff committees, and software results analyzed by 
external stakeholders



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

31

(b) Has academic programmes that are in line 
with its mission and objectives and address the 
expectations and needs of stakeholders; therefore, 
the programmes show range, depth, coherence, 
quality and relevance; are up to date and adequate 
in content and scope, promoting core content, ideas, 
values and the acquisition of employability skills, such 
as work-related learning/attachment/ internship/
traineeship;

20. How are the programmes linked to the labour market needs, 
social needs, and development of different disciplines nationally, and 
regionally?

21. Do the courses / modules / programmes reflect pedagogical 
approaches to curriculum design, and not just technical approaches?

22. How are the needs of society identified and included in the 
programmes? Are there any other changes such as in research, 
technology, students’ needs or employers’ expectations, that affect the 
programme? 

(c) Ensures that programme structures and credit 
hours/units are in accord with international norms for 
the amount of study required for each qualification it 
offers (or for the level of the qualifications awarded); 
and that programmes are approved by the relevant 
national QAA and professional bodies, where 
applicable;

23. How many of your programmes are accredited by your Quality 
Assurance Body?

(d) Has effective mechanisms for stakeholder 
participation in curriculum design, review and 
validation, including feedback from students, alumni 
and employers;

24. Does your institution involve external stakeholders in the design of 
new programmes? If so, how are they involved in the design of the study 
programmes? Any examples in the last five years?

25. How are the various internal (including students) and external 
stakeholders involved in periodic monitoring and evaluation?

26. Do you conduct and analyze surveys of students, employers, and 
alumni?

27. Are these surveys statistically representative?

•	 Results of surveys of students’ opinions concerning the 
programme learning outcomes

•	 Results of surveys of the teaching staff opinions concerning the 
learning outcomes of study programmes

•	 Studies on the labour market and the satisfaction of graduates and 
employers

•	 Structured feedback mechanisms from the labour market and 
alumni

•	 Use of developed software for programme evaluation by external 
stakeholders such as alumni and employers

•	 Compatibility and consistency between programme learning 
outcomes and the labour market requirements



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

32

(e) Has policies requiring formulated learning outcomes 
to be defined and documented for all programmes and 
courses, and ensures that the programme specifications are 
accessible to learners (or stakeholders);

28. Are the learning outcomes for all types of programme delivery clear, 
accessible and realistic?

29. Are the learning outcomes communicated to prospective students, 
current students and staff?

30. Is the development of learning outcomes evident in the curriculum and 
stated assessment modes?

31. Are assessment tasks mapped to each learning outcome? What is 
the system of identification of achieved learning outcomes? How are the 
learning outcomes validated?

32. Do the learning outcomes for the different modes of curriculum delivery 
of the study programmes encompass specific subject matter knowledge as 
well as generic skills such as problem-solving, collaborative, communication, 
analytical and ICT skills?

(f) Has structures and procedures for the approval of 
programmes by relevant bodies, such as the Senate, and 
authorities such as professional bodies, if applicable;

(g) Has programmes that are delivered by adequate, 
qualified and competent staff with pedagogical skills;

33. What are the qualifications and experience of your teaching staff? •	 The extent of consistency of the qualifications of the faculty members 
with areas of specialization

•	 Provision of a table with information on the number of teaching staff with 
Bachelor’s degree, Masters and Doctorate degree, including pedagogical 
training, age and gender.

(h) Has appropriate formal agreements for all programmes 
offered in partnership with other institutions, specifying 
in detail the roles and responsibilities of both partners, 
including teaching commitments and QA arrangements; and

•	 Samples of agreements and partnerships.

(i) Ensures that the formulated learning outcomes are 
benchmarked against level descriptors of national or 
regional Qualifications Frameworks, as applicable.

34. Are the learning outcomes aligned to the national / regional 
qualifications framework, relevant standards, national / professional 
accreditation requirements and workforce needs?



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

33

In the case of ODL, the pre-testing of learning 
materials is essential for ensuring that the learners 
will be able to achieve the objectives or intended 
learning outcomes.

The broad requirement of pretesting should be made 
available, for example:

(a) students’ understanding of the objectives;

(b) Language of presentation;

(c) Explanation of concepts, ideas and theories;

(d) Use of examples for illustration;

(e) Activities and practice exercises given, and 
feedback provided;

(f) Use of symbols or icons;

(g) Navigational devices for online materials;

(h) Motivate and sustain learners’ interests; and

(i) Use didactic concepts in writing modules.

35. Does your institution offer ODeL Programmes?

36. Does the institution have in place standard formats for 
instructional design and development such programmes? How 
are these implemented?

37. Do the instructional designs recognize diversity of learners’ 
learning contexts and learning styles, and ensure realistic 
scheduling of activities?  Do the designs include assessment of 
learning against stated learning outcomes?

38. What technologies are in place (multimedia learning 
resources) to engage and support learners and to provide them 
with communication facilities? How is the appropriateness of 
these technologies measured?

39. What types of learning activities are provided in the study 
programmes to encourage active learning, collaborative learning, 
and self-assessment?

40. How does the institution ensure there is appropriate personnel 
for quality production of course materials? What procedures are 
in place for the quality production processes?

•	 Policy for the implementation of ODeL programmes 
•	 Templates are designed and developed for effective instructional 

design and efficient course development
•	 The institution provides prior training and necessary inputs to the 

staff involved in instructional design and development
•	 The institution adheres to the agreed formalities and templates 

to be used for instructional design and development
•	 The instructional design template requires the use of inclusive 

language and provides a variety of activities that accommodate 
different learning styles, circumstances and preferences

•	 Scheduling of activities addresses the needs of distance learners 
and their access to technology and other facilities

•	 Learning outcomes are clearly stated. Assessment is designed to 
measure achievement of learning outcomes in terms of defined 
criteria

•	 Appropriate technology is used to engage and support learners
•	 Communication with learners uses the technologies that are most 

accessible to the learners such as the internet, mobile phone, 
telephone, television and radio

•	 The institution analyses the ease of use and level of technology 
available to the learners

•	 Appropriate learning strategies such as experiential learning, 
collaborative learning and personal learning are designed into 
the courses

•	 The institution systematically records and assesses the 
effectiveness and impact of learning strategies

•	 Roles and responsibilities for quality assurance in course materials 
design, development and production are clearly specified

•	 The institution has mechanisms to ensure the relevant 
competence of the content developers, technical and support 
staff and others involved in course design, development and 
production

•	 Technical and production standards in course design, development 
and production are clearly specified

•	 The course materials developed are pilot-tested and quality 
assured with reference to the aims and objectives of the study 
programmes and learners’ needs prior to their release for 
extensive use

•	 The institution receives regular feedback from tutors on the 
course materials, with reference to their user friendliness, 
appropriateness and effectiveness

•	 The feedback is used in improving the course materials and 
assuring their quality



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

34

STANDARD 8. TEACHING, LEARNING AND ASSESSMENT

Standard Focus Points – Guiding Questions Examples of good practice / Evidence
The institution shall put in place, in a way that is consistent 
with its vision and mission, policies and procedures that 
promote learning and acquisition of appropriate knowledge, 
competencies and skills; and assure fair and transparent 
assessment based on student-centered assessment. 

The assessment principles, standards and procedures are 
explicit and made available publicly to both students and staff.

Guidelines 

Teaching and learning is one of the core activities of a higher 
education institution, and it is important that the academic 
staff and facilitators ensure quality student experience to 
enable the students to acquire appropriate knowledge, 
competences and skills.

The institution ensures that:

a) The teaching, learning and assessment strategies are 
student-centered and flexible; motivate students’ self-
reflection and engagement in the learning process;

Teaching and Learning

1. How does the institution ensure that the teaching and learning 
strategies are suitable for the mode of delivery or offering type?

2. How does the institution ensure that the teaching and learning 
methods are appropriate for the achievement of the intended learning 
outcomes?

3. Describe what mechanisms are in place to ensure that teaching staff 
have the required skills and experience to facilitate effective learning? 

4. Explain what mechanisms are in place for staff continuous 
professional development?

5. What collaborative teaching practices are applied to encourage 
students to build and hone critical and independent thinking skills, and 
engage them actively in the learning process that would enable them 
to master required competencies (participative learning, experiential 
learning, collaborative learning approaches, etc.)?

•	 Teaching, learning and assessment framework/ policy
•	 Written reports on analyses of different types of evaluations, including 

challenges/weaknesses identified and recommended corrective measures 
to improve the quality of teaching, learning and assessment

•	 Written records of reports on student evaluations shared with students
•	 Records of student performance and achievement of learning outcomes



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

35

b) The environment and resources are appropriate and 
adequate to support each student;

6. How does the institution ensure that a conducive teaching and 
learning environment is provided to support students’ active learning 
and enable them to achieve learning outcomes?

7. How does the institution support students of different backgrounds 
and with diverse needs?

•	 Strategies used to cater to student diversity
•	 Written records of accommodating student diversity

c) There are systems in place for periodic monitoring, 
assessment and evaluation of the teaching and learning 
approaches for quality improvement; and

8. What systems are in place to monitor and evaluate teaching and 
learning methods? How regularly is this done and who are involved 
in these activities?

9. What mechanisms are in place to ensure feedback about student 
satisfaction on the teaching, learning and assessment methods and 
processes? 

10. What monitoring and evaluation systems does the institution 
have in place to ensure continuous enhancement of learning and 
facilitation?

11. How does the institution ensure that quality of teaching and 
learning approaches are upheld?

•	 Written records of training interventions in response to corrective actions 
to improve pedagogical and assessment methods and skills of lecturers/ 
efficiency of tools and methods used to evaluate performance of lecturers

•	 Tool (questionnaire) for head of department-lecturer evaluations
•	 Tool for peer evaluations

d) There are mechanisms for students to provide feedback on 
their learning experience.

12. What mechanisms and processes are in place to solicit students’ 
views on their learning experience? How often is this done, if students 
in fact participate in these feedback activities? 

13. Should students not participate in the feedback activities, what 
strategies are used to motivate them to provide feedback?

•	 Student satisfaction surveys (tool for student-lecturer evaluations, tool 
for student-course evaluations)



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

36

In the case of ODL:

a) The decision on the medium or media of delivery 
should take into account the following:

i. Accessibility to the learners,

ii. Cost of using it, both by the institution at installation 
and maintenance, as well as learner cost,

iii. Teaching strengths in relation to specific content,

iv. Its capacity in creating inter-activity,

v. Organisational requirements for development,

vi. Its novelty, and

vii. Speed within which it can be set up.

b) There are face-to-face sessions to provide general 
orientation and introduction to the course materials at 
the commencement of the course;

c) There are special face-to-face sessions for difficult 
aspects of the course during the programme/course; 
and

d) There are face-to-face sessions to provide some 
revision work to learners before examinations.

Open and Distance Learning

14. What mechanisms does the institution have in place for 
the effective implementation of ODL?

15. How does the institution ensure adequate and suitable 
infrastructure, information and communication technology 
(ICT) resources, library and information resources, etc. 
for ODL students to support their teaching, learning and 
academic needs?

16. What fee structure does the institution have in place 
to specify various costs (to students and the institution) 
associated with ODL offering?

17. What plans and procedures are in place to ensure ODL 
offerings are not inferior to face-to-face teaching, learning and 
assessment (e.g., supporting DE students with difficult aspects 
of the curriculum, examination revision and preparation, 
amongst other)?

18. What arrangements are in place to teach ODL students 
and how does the institution ensure that all students have 
equal access to teaching?

19. How does the institution cater for orientation of distance 
education (DE) students?

20. What arrangements are in place to assist distance 
education students with difficult aspects of the curriculum?

21. What arrangements are in place to cater for examination 
revision sessions for distance education students?

•	 ODL policy and guidelines

•	 Fee structure for ODL

•	 Reports detailing costs of offering ODL

•	 Continuous training and professional development 
interventions for lecturers

•	 Reports on training interventions for lecturers teaching in the 
DE mode

•	 Timetables and attendance lists for student orientation 
sessions, contact sessions and examination preparation 
sessions 



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

37

Student assessment is one of the most important 
elements of higher education because the outcomes of 
such assessment have a profound effect on students’ 
progression and future careers. It is, therefore, 
important that assessment is carried out professionally 
at all times. This implies that:

a) The assessment and procedures are published and 
consistently applied, and include:

i. A range of assessment methods (e.g., coursework, 
projects, research, dissertation and examinations to 
serve formative and summative assessment purposes),

ii. Internal and external moderation,

iii. Invigilation procedures,

iv. Monitoring of student progress,

v. Validity and reliability of assessment practices,

vi. Recording of assessment results and settling of 
disputes, and

vii. Rigour and security of assessment system.

Student assessment

22. How are staff and students informed about assessment 
principles, standards and procedures (what platforms/ 
methods are used to convey this information)?

23. Does the institution have an assessment and moderation 
policy? What processes are in place to ensure effective 
implementation thereof?

24. What mechanisms are in place to ensure that formative 
and summative assessment methods are appropriate for 
their purpose?

25. What is the level of competency of academic staff to 
develop assessment strategies fit to effectively measure 
students’ progress towards achieving learning outcomes?

26. What mechanisms are in place to ensure that the 
assessment methods will effectively measure the students’ 
progress towards achieving the learning outcomes for the 
programme?

27. How are assessment results and decisions recorded and 
documented in a secure, accurate and systematic way?

28. What mechanisms and procedures are in place for data 
capture and management? What control procedures and 
security measures are in place for the storage of assessment 
results?

29. How is internal and external moderation conducted? 
Does the assessment system make provision for internal and 
external moderation, and at which levels? 

30. Are there effective invigilation procedures in place? How 
are examinations, including invigilation, dealt with in an 
accurate and secure manner?

31. Does the assessment system make provision for work-
based learning?

•	 Assessment and moderation policy

•	 Examination procedures guidelines/ manual

•	 Guidelines for assessors/examiners and moderators 

•	 System for capturing students’ examination grades/results

•	 Students’ progression records



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

38

(b) Assessment standards are spelled out for each 
programme and are competence- or outcomes-based, 
where applicable;

(c) Assessment is carried out by competent and 
impartial examiners;

32. What measures are in place to ensure that students are 
assessed by well-qualified and experienced staff?

33. What staff development opportunities does the institution 
have in place to enhance assessment practices and skills of 
academics?

34. What mechanisms are in place to ensure that staff, including 
examiners and moderators, who conduct assessments 
understand the principles and functions of assessment? 

35. How does the institution ensure that assessment is 
conducted securely and with rigour and fairness?

•	 Appointment procedures for moderators

•	 Reports on staff development and training interventions and 
effectiveness thereof 

(d) Integrity of examinations and award of degrees are 
ensured to guard against examination malpractice;

36. What mechanisms are in place to ensure the integrity and 
accuracy of examinations and the issuing of certificates?  

•	 Assessors/examiners and moderators’ reports

(e) There are  regular  objective  feedback  to  students  
on  their  strengths  and weaknesses, and appropriate 
counselling support for improvement;

37. Does the institution have systems in place to identify poor 
performing students and how does the institution deal with 
such students?

(f) There is a disciplinary and appeals process for 
students who may feel aggrieved; and

38. How does the institution deal with student appeals and 
disciplinary cases? Which systems and procedures are in place?

(g) There is a QA handbook, which is known to staff and 
students.

39. Does the institution have a handbook/guide/manual that 
details internal quality assurance activities and procedures? 
Through what means is it accessible to staff and students?

•	 Reports on internal QA activities and effectiveness thereof



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

39

STANDARD 9. RESEARCH AND INNOVATION

Standard Examples of good practice – Evidence
The institution shall encourage, promote, and engage in innovative research consistent 
with its policies and strategic plans, and address national, regional, continental, and 
international needs. The institution shall encourage innovation in its teaching, learning 
and research. 

The institution shall ensure that the management of postgraduate studies is conducted 
within an approved framework of institutional policies and plans that ensure quality 
ethical research. 

Guidelines

Research is one of the core activities of a higher education institution, and the institution 
therefore requires an institution-wide research policy that sets the direction of its research. 
The policy is at both institutional and research-programme level (postgraduate studies) to 
ensure proper engagement in research.

The institution ensures that: 

a) There is a shared understanding of the nature, role and goals of research; 

•	 The research policy and objectives are formalized in the institution’s implementation plan, 
in accordance with national and regional policy and its priorities. They are disseminated and 
shared.

•	 The research objectives are relevant to the context and needs of the territories.
•	 The nature of the research is consistent with the institution’s missions and values.

b) There are standards, procedures and processes for the approval of research proposals, and 
theses, and the conduct and supervision of research studies; 

•	 The institution’s organisational chart makes the structure, hierarchy and the entire organisation 
of research (tasks, functions, responsibilities) visible.

•	 The requirements for the approval of theses and research topics are decided in the bodies 
provided for this purpose (scientific committee and council), documented in the minutes and 
kept. They are visible and communicated to all interested parties

•	 Consultation of the research-specific procedures manual, which includes the procedure for 
selecting a research topic (ensuring ethics, transparency and fairness).

•	 Research master plans following the country’s priority themes are developed and made 
available to doctoral students, doctoral schools and all interested parties.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

40

c) There are policies, research management systems and strategies, adequate infrastructure and 
resources that facilitate all staff to undertake innovative research, and publish research results;

•	 There is a research strategy plan validated by the relevant bodies (scientific committee and council).
•	 Measuring equipment must be regularly checked and calibrated (existence of calibration certificate).
•	 Compliance with the requirements of ISO 17025 for testing laboratories (research)
•	 Compliance with health and safety rules in accordance with the requirements of ISO 45001
•	 The human resources within the laboratories (researchers and support staff) are sufficient, both qualitatively 

and quantitatively.
•	 The laboratory should monitor, control and record environmental conditions in accordance with the 

requirements of relevant specifications, methods and procedures, or where they affect the quality of results.
•	 In laboratories, adjacent areas where there are incompatible activities should be separated.
•	 The environmental conditions of teaching rooms and areas (electricity, heating, air conditioning, humidity, 

etc.) must be controlled so as not to disrupt either the proper conduct of teaching and assessment or the 
socialisation of learners. Records of these conditions exist for verification.

•	 Planning of scientific visits is documented and implemented to enable researchers to communicate their 
results.

•	 Instructions for testing should be documented and posted in the vicinity of the equipment concerned.

d) There are standards and processes for the approval of research proposals and theses, in line with the 
research needs of the national or regional context, and capacity building possibilities for researchers, 
management of research partnerships and research contracts, handling of intellectual property and 
commercialisation of research, and effective and trustworthy management of research information; 

•	 Training and awareness-raising activities on intellectual property are regularly organised. Information about 
these activities is documented and kept.

•	 There is an incubator in the institution.
•	 Research promotion activities are documented and kept.
•	 A specific structure for the relationship with the socio-economic sector, for applied research, exists 

(verification of an internal or ministerial order).
•	 Research projects are financed by various public and private sources.
•	 Verification of the number, quality and relevance of contracts with external partners for applied 

research that meets societal needs (public companies, private companies, administration, NGOs, etc.).

e) There is adequate academic integrity through the establishment and use of appropriate 
research committees and boards to ensure academic integrity; 

•	 Existence of an internal or ministerial decree creating a body responsible for the respect and 
monitoring of ethics and deontology.

•	 The code of ethics and deontology (specific to research, or including a specific part for research) 
is documented, available and communicated. It should include all requirements regarding non-
discrimination of researchers.

•	 Documented information on the researcher’s formal commitment to ethics and professional 
conduct is maintained and accessible.

•	 Awareness-raising and outreach activities are regularly organised for researchers (document 
verification of these activities).

•	 Documented evidence that training on plagiarism is regularly organised is kept and available.



Users’ Guide for the African Standard and Guidelines for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA)

41

f) The research undertaken is relevant and responsive to the needs for academic advancement and 
community development expectations; and 

•	 Existence of a procedure to facilitate scientific and technological monitoring; this is disseminated to all 
researchers.

•	 The research themes developed are in line with the planned research policy and strategy.
•	 Have a policy of cooperation and partnership agreements in order to meet the needs of the socio-economic 

environment (public or private).
•	 Ensure, internally, the pooling of research resources and activities.
•	 Encourage transdisciplinary and multidisciplinary research themes.
•	 Identify the areas of expertise in order to seize partnership and funding opportunities in its 

environment.
•	 The development plans of the research laboratories integrate the forecasted development of human 

resources.
•	 Have procedures for the promotion of researchers with predefined criteria.
•	 The career development of researchers is documented and visible in the research-specific procedure book 

(or other document); it is transparent, fair and based on merit; for this purpose, the criteria are predefined 
and communicated to researchers.

•	 The institution plans and implements training and coaching for young researchers to acquire the necessary 
skills, and evaluates the effectiveness of these activities; this information is documented and maintained.

•	 The institution has a policy for making organisational knowledge available to young researchers, as necessary, 
through training and awareness-raising activities; this information is documented and maintained.

g) There is effective monitoring and evaluation of the research system. •	 Internal and external evaluations of research (projects, laboratories, etc.) are regularly planned and carried 
out. Evaluations are carried out taking into account the specificity of the disciplines and using different 
criteria depending on the objectives p